Hawaii, session 2025, GM1382.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that agriculture was the
economic mainstay for many of the State's rural communities.
This industry, specifically sugar cane and pineapple, had a
greater stake in how and where communities grew. Over the past
four decades, communities have witnessed the end of the era of
the State's plantation heritage: in 1971, the Kahuku sugar mill
closed; in 1996, the Waialua sugar mill closed; in 2008, Del
Monte fresh produce ended operations; and in 2016, Hawaiian
Commercial & Sugar Company ended sugar operations.
A report released by the department of agriculture.
Statewide Agricultural Land Use Baseline 2015, and updated in
2020, shows a dramatic change in agricultural land over forty
years as sugar production and pineapple production have
downsized. According to the department of agriculture, there
were 120,630 acres of agricultural land in crop production in
2020 compared to 350,830 acres in crop production in 1980.
2025-2914 SB739 CDl SMA.docx

Page 2
S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
Article XI, section 3, of the Hawaii State Constitution,
directs the State to conserve and protect agricultural lands,
promote diversified agriculture, increase agricultural
self-sufficiency, and assure the availability of agriculturally
suitable lands. The State's agricultural production is
insufficient to meet the State's food consumption needs. This
over-reliance on imported food creates critical health, safety,
and security issues for the State and threatens the State's
sustainable future and preparedness for future disasters,
emergencies, and crises. The legislature further finds that
attempts to stimulate diversified agriculture in the private
sector through regulatory controls and land use and zoning
restrictions are not sufficient to address the business needs
and subsidies necessary to effectively and significantly
increase diversified agriculture to the extent necessary to
avoid Hawaii's agricultural self-sufficiency crisis. Where
feasible, the State must take a more active role in providing
assistance and subsidies that promote farming businesses.
The legislature further finds that over the years, the
State has prioritized a shift toward sustainability in
agriculture and decreasing our food imports. Act 55, Session
2025-2914 SB739 GDI SMA.docx
miiHoiwiiniHiwM

Page 3 S.B. NO. "2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
Laws of Hawaii 2013, amends the Hawaii State Planning Act to
promote economically competitive activities that increase
Hawaii's agricultural self-sufficiency, including the increased
purchase and use of Hawaii-grown food and food products by
residents, businesses, and governmental bodies. On September 1,
2016, Governor Ige pledged a commitment for Hawaii to double its
food production by 2020. To accomplish that objective, the
governor prioritized making more land available for agriculture.
Large tracts of agricultural land, including those formerly
used for pineapple and sugar cane, are now fallow. These lands
provide a unique opportunity for the State to fulfill the intent
of the Hawaii State Constitution regarding diversified
agriculture and agricultural self-sufficiency through
acquisition of suitable agricultural land for long-term leases
for diversified, bona fide agricultural operations to increase
agricultural production.
The legislature also finds that the State continues to face
a crisis in homelessness, affordable housing, workforce housing,
and other housing inventory for the State's residents.
According to the December 2016 Report to the Hawaii State
Legislature in response to Act 127, Session Laws of Hawaii 2016,
2025-2914 SB739 CDl SMA.docx

Page 4 S.B. NO.
3^2
CD. 1
by the special action team on affordable rental housing,
approximately 24,551 housing units were needed statewide in the
five-year period from 2016 to 2020. Hawaii faces a critical
shortage of safe, sanitary, and affordable housing units;
work-force housing; and other housing inventory for Hawaii
residents and the legislature must act to eliminate or reduce
that shortage. State initiatives acknowledging and attempting
to mitigate this crisis include:
(1) Providing affordable rental and for-sale housing.
Act 127, Session Laws of Hawaii 2016, as amended by
Act 96, Session Laws of Hawaii 2017, establishes a
goal of developing or vesting the development of at
least 22,500 affordable rental housing units ready for
occupancy by December 31, 2026, and establishes the
special action team on affordable rental housing to
make recommendations on actions to promote the
development of at least 22,500 affordable rental
housing units to be ready for occupancy between
January 1, 2017, and December 31, 2026. The special
action team's report to the legislature recommended
expanding the public lands available for consideration
2025-2914 SB739 GDI SMA.docx

Page 5 S.B. NO.
"2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
to meet housing needs and also explained its ten-year
plan and current development of suitability maps to
identify state, county, and private parcels of land on
each island that may be used for residential units.
Additionally, the 2016 Hawaii housing planning study
prepared by SMS for the Hawaii housing finance and
development corporation found that a shortage of land
available for development was a significant factor
limiting the supply of housing;
(2) Development of state lands around transit-oriented
development areas for housing. Act 130, Session Laws
of Hawaii 2016, authorizes the department of education
to use fees collected from transit-oriented
development projects to be used for existing schools
in the development area to address increases in school
populations due to transit-oriented development, and
establishes an interagency council for
transit-oriented development. In addition. Act 131,
Session Laws of Hawaii 2016, enables the Hawaii
housing finance and development corporation to develop
mixed-use developments in partnership with state and
2025-2914 SB739 CDl SMA.docx

Page 6 S.B. NO.
-2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
county departments and agencies. The Hawaii
interagency council for transit-oriented development's
report to the legislature noted that, as one of the
largest landowners along the Honolulu rail corridor,
the State has a unique opportunity to revitalize
neighborhoods, increase affordable housing, and
improve accessibility to public facilities and
services by applying smart growth and transit-oriented
development principles as the construction of the rail
transit system progresses; and
(3) Supporting housing projects through state
infrastructure planning and construction. Act 130,
Session Laws of Hawaii 2016, requires the Hawaii
interagency council for transit-oriented development
to identify transit-oriented development projects that
lack sufficient infrastructure. In addition, Act 131,
Session Laws of Hawaii 2016, includes infrastructure
in its mandate to develop mixed-use developments and
Act 132, Session Laws of Hawaii 2016, provides grants
and loans to state agencies, and loans to the counties
and private developers for infrastructure
2025-2914 SB739 CDl SMA.docx 6
iBiiiiiHiiiiHiinnniiiiiiii

Page 7 739
S.B. NO
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
improvements. The Hawaii interagency council for
transit-oriented development's report to the
legislature also noted the importance of this issue,
listing infrastructure as the most pressing concern
that needed to be considered as transit-oriented
development is pursued statewide.
The legislature further finds that lack of suitable,
entitled lands for development of appropriate housing is a major
contributing factor to the housing crisis, and substantial
obstacles and delays in entitling such lands discourage
development, lower housing inventory, and raise housing prices,
among other negative effects.
Addressing the challenges of the State's agricultural
self-sufficiency and housing crises will require courageous and
novel legislation that addresses these issues in an expeditious,
economical, and flexible manner. The legislature additionally
finds that land exchanges completed in other states, such as
exchanges of state lands for privately owned lands to meet the
needs of and mutually benefit both parties, have provided public
benefit in the areas of conservation, economic growth, ecology,
and recreation. Land exchanges thereby present a viable method
2025-2914 SB739 GDI SMA.docx 7
liiiiiiniviiiiiiiiBiiiiiiii

Page 8 S.B. NO.
"2
C.D. 1
of addressing the many housing and agricultural issues facing
the State. Land exchanges present a win-win situation where the
State is able to negotiate a mutually beneficial exchange of
developable state lands for housing for privately owned
agricultural lands for farming.
The purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Allow the governor, subject to approval by the board
of land and natural resources, to negotiate land
exchanges consistent with and in furtherance of the
State's agricultural and housing needs and purposes,
in a manner that ideally addresses all needs and
purposes; and
(2) Require the governor to submit a report to the
legislature of the negotiated land exchanges for final
approval.
SECTION 2. (a) Subject to approval by the board of land
and natural resources, the governor may negotiate land exchanges
in accordance with chapter 171, Hawaii Revised Statutes, for the
purpose of acquiring private lands that are suitable for
long-term diversified agricultural production by the State or
its lessees, in exchange for state lands to be acquired by
2025-2914 SB739 CDl SMA.docx

Page 9 S.B. NO.
-2
C.D. 1
private parties for development of affordable housing, workforce
housing, and other housing inventory for Hawaii residents.
(b) The governor may coordinate with the agribusiness
development corporation, the department of land and natural
resources, and any other department or agency of the State that
holds title to or an assignment of state land that may be
appropriate for exchange under subsection (a); provided that
lands undergoing the development entitlement process and on
which substantial state funds have been expended shall not be
considered priority lands for an exchange under subsection (a).
(c) It is the intent of this Act that the exchanges
negotiated pursuant to this Act will result in exchanges that
address the State's agricultural and housing crises by:
(1) Obtaining large tracts of suitable agricultural lands
for the State to lease to farmers for diversified
agriculture; and
(2) Providing private parties with suitable urban lands
for the expeditious development of affordable housing,
workforce housing, and other housing inventory for
Hawaii residents, and mixed use commercial and
accessory uses within areas designated for
2025-2914 SB739 GDI SMA.docx 9

Page 10 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
transit-oriented development and other appropriate
urbanized areas.
(d) To facilitate successful negotiation of land
exchanges, including the enhancement of optimal agricultural
lands acquired by the State in exchange for urbanized lands and
the expedient consummation of exchanges, the governor may,
pursuant to subsection (e)(3), reclassify and rezone lands
intended for exchange under this Act and transfer such state
lands, authorized by subsection (a), to private parties for
development of housing and other mixed uses within the state
urban land use district with appropriate county residential or
mixed-use zoning, subject to the following:
(1) The lands shall be within a one-half-mile radius of
any rail station approved by the Federal
Transportation Administration within the city and
county of Honolulu;
(2) Any development on the lands to be transferred to
private parties shall comply with all state and county
laws, rules, and regulations regarding health and
safety and building permit requirements for housing or
mixed-use developments on private lands, and after
2025-2914 SB739 GDI SMA.docx 10

Page 11 S.B. NO.
-2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
transfer shall not be subject to laws, rules, and
regulations applicable to state lands except as
required by this Act; and
(3) Any lands received from private parties as part of a
land exchange pursuant to subsection (a) shall assume
the ceded or public land trust character of the state
lands for which the lands were exchanged.
(e) To promote exchanges that address the objectives of
the State in acquiring more lands for diversified agriculture
and encouraging private parties to develop more affordable
housing, workforce housing, and other housing inventory:
(1) Appraisals shall be performed, in compliance with
section 171-50, of state lands for purposes of
exchange with the urban, residential, or mixed-use
land; provided that appraisals shall reflect any
land-use reclassification and rezoning adopted
pursuant to this Act;
(2) The development of housing on private lands as
contemplated by this Act shall be subject to chapters
6E and 343, Hawaii Revised Statutes, as applicable to
private housing on private lands, notwithstanding the
2025-2914 SB739 CDl SMA.docx 11

Page 12
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
prior state ownership of the land or the use of state
or county housing assistance programs;
(3) The governor, as necessary to facilitate and effect
the purposes of this Act, may submit notifications and
supporting information to:
(A) The land use commission for any necessary
reclassification of land; and
(B) The planning director of the appropriate county
for any necessary rezoning of land;
provided that the reclassification and rezoning shall
be adopted within thirty days of receipt of the
governor's notification;
(4) Private development of housing or mixed uses on
private lands, as contemplated by this Act, shall be
exempt from all applicable state and county
procurement requirements, impact fees, and other
exactions;
(5) The governor and all related state and county agencies
shall take such further actions as may be necessary to
facilitate and effect the purposes of this Act;
2025-2914 SB739 GDI SMA.docx 12
iiiiiiriMiiiniHiiue

Page 13
S B. NO. g-
C.D. 1
(6) Consummation of any exchange pursuant to this Act
shall be subject to the requirements of section 3 of
this Act; and
(7) Any state land transferred to a private party pursuant
to this Act shall include a restrictive covenant or
reversionary interest in the deed in favor of the
State that requires the land to be used for the
development of affordable housing, workforce housing,
or other housing inventory.
SECTION 3. The governor shall submit a report to the
legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of
the regular session of 2026 on:
(1) The feasibility of any land exchanges of agricultural
parcels of high interest to the State in exchange for
urbanized lands for appropriate private development
negotiated by the governor as contemplated by this
Act, a list of lands suitable for such an exchange,
and a description and the market value of the parcels;
and
2025-2914 SB739 CDl SMA.docx 13
■UIIIIMffllMIIIBmH

Page 14 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(2) Any appropriations, proposed legislation, or
administrative action necessary to accomplish the
goals of this Act.
After receipt of the governor's report, the legislature, if
not in session, may convene in special session pursuant to
article III, section 10 of the Hawaii State Constitution to act
on land exchanges proposed pursuant to this Act.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-2914 SB739 CDl SMA.docx 14
■liMIIIIIIHHIHHIillllU

S.B. NO 739
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 2nd day of July ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 739, S.D. 2, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
193

SB No. 739, SD 2, HD 1,CD1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
I
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives